src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Hill Mari (Western Mari) verb inflection

## Irregular lexica

Also lexica for +Hom tags

* **LEXICON VAux** = auxiliaries 

* **LEXICON V_AM-HOM1** homonyms @hid=Hom1

* **LEXICON V_EM-HOM2** homonyms @hid=Hom2

* **LEXICON V_AM_SUB** substandard

* **LEXICON V_EM_SUB** substandard

## Regular verbs

Both *-am* and *-em* verbs and their subgroups.

### V_AM verbs


LEXICON V_IAEM
Approximately 619 2014-12-21
Front Vowel harmony for V_AM verbs
LEXICON V_IAEM-SG3
Approximately 4 2014-12-21
Front Vowel harmony for V_AM-SG3 verbs
LEXICON V_IAEM-3
Approximately 2 2014-12-21
Front Vowel harmony for V_AM-3 verbs

LEXICON V_MOAM
Approximately 465 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM	verbs
LEXICON V_MOAM-SG3
Approximately 2 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
Approximately 1 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs

### STEM CHANGE
LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM
Approximately 12 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM verbs
LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM-SG3
Approximately 0 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM-3
Approximately 0 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs

LEXICON V_KACHKAM
Approximately 11 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM verbs
LEXICON V_KACHKAM-SG3
Approximately 0 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 0 2014-12-21
Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs

### V_EM verbs

LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 1052 2014-12-21
Front Vowel harmony for V_EM	verbs
LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 2 2014-12-21
Front Vowel harmony for V_EM-SG3 verbs

LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 1315 2014-12-21
Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs
LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 4 2014-12-21
Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs
LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
Approximately 1 2014-12-21
Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs

## Lexica pointing to suffix lexica

### Intermediate AM lexica

LEXICON V_AM  ӹштӓш:ӹшт









пелӓш: онг пелеш
What else is needed 2014-05-08

### Intermediate EM lexcia



хӹдӹртӓш: хӹдӹртӹ
What else is needed 2014-05-08


* **LEXICON V_EM** колташ:колты









## Suffix lexica

### NONPAST

#### am verbs

INDPRSSG1-am

INDPRSSG2-am

INDPRSSG3-am

INDPRSPL1-am

INDPRSPL2-am

INDPRSPL3-am

INDPRSCONNEG-am

INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am

#### em verbs

INDPRSSG1-em

INDPRSSG2-em

INDPRSSG3-em



INDPRSPL3-em





### PRETERIT 1

#### am

INDPRT1SG1-am

INDPRT1SG2-am

INDPRT1SG3-am

INDPRT1PL1-am

INDPRT1PL2-am

INDPRT1PL3-am

INDPRT1CONNEG-am

INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am

#### em

INDPRT1SG1-em

INDPRT1SG2-em

INDPRT1SG3-em

INDPRT1PL1-em

INDPRT1PL2-em

INDPRT1PL3-em

INDPRT1CONNEG-em

INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-em

### PRETERIT 2

#### am
INDPRT2SG1-am

INDPRT2SG2-am

INDPRT2SG3-am

INDPRT2PL1-am

INDPRT2PL2-am

INDPRT2PL3-am

INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am

#### em








INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am
INDPRT2NEG-am

### IMPERATIVE


IMPRTSG2-am

IMPRTSG3-am

IMPRTPL2-am

IMPRTPL3-am

IMPRTIISG2-am

IMPRTIIPL2-am








### DESIDERATIVE
DES-am
DESSG1-am
DESSG2-am
DESSG3-am
DESPL1-am
DESPL2-am
DESPL3-am

DES-em
DESSG1-em
DESSG2-em
DESSG3-em
DESPL1-em
DESPL2-em
DESPL3-em


### INFINITIVE


INF

NEG-PRC

PASS-PRC


INF_BACK

NEG-PRC_BACK

PASS-PRC_BACK

ACT-PRC_BACK

INF_FRONT

NEG-PRC_FRONT

PASS-PRC_FRONT

ACT-PRC_FRONT


* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-mrj/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
